Utah statutes.
9-8-704.   Division duties.
The division shall, according to policy established by the board:
(1)  allocate money from the state fund to the endowment fund created by a
qualifying organization under Section 9-8-703;
(2)  determine the eligibility of each qualifying organization to receive
money from the state fund into the endowment fund of the qualifying
organization;
(3)  determine the matching amount each qualifying organization must raise in
order to qualify to receive money from the state fund;
(4)  establish a date by which each qualifying organization must provide its
matching funds;
(5)  verify that matching funds have been provided by each qualifying
organization by the date determined in Subsection (4); and
(6)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, establish criteria by rule not otherwise prescribed in this chapter for
determining the eligibility of qualifying organizations to receive money from
the state fund.
